Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 3. FACILITIES AND SERVICES FOR CHILDREN

SUBTITLE D. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 80. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 80.001. FINGERPRINTING FOR IDENTIFICATION. (a) A state law enforcement agency or the law enforcement agency of any political subdivision of the state shall comply with the request of a person to have a record of his fingerprints made or a record of the fingerprints of a child or ward of the person made.

(b) A law enforcement agency may charge a fee not to exceed $10 for the service provided under this section and may retain records of fingerprints made under this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 117, Sec. 6(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 695, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 80.003. CHILDREN BORN TO IMPRISONED WOMEN. (a) The department shall provide medical care for a child born to a woman who, at the time of giving birth, is imprisoned in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice if there is no other source of payment for the medical care.

(b) In this section, "medical care" means the care relating to childbirth and the period of the child's hospitalization immediately following the birth or rehospitalization in the first 28 days of life.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1117, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 80.002 by Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 12, Sec. 2(15), eff. Sept. 6, 1990.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.116, eff. September 1, 2009.